Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 264.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 198.750, 198.755,  198.760, 198.765, 198.775, 198.850,
198.855 and 198.857, land may be annexed to a district as provided in this section.
(2) The owner of a parcel of land may petition the county  board to annex the land to a
district if:
(a) The land is surrounded by the district; and
(b) The water supply for the land has become inadequate or contaminated, as  determined
by the local health department, as a result of conditions caused by a wildfire that is  the
subject of a state of emergency declared by the Governor.
(3) The petition must declare that the petition is filed  pursuant to this section, state the
name of the district and all affected counties, indicate the principal Act of  the district, be
signed by the owner of the parcel of land  and state the conditions that caused the water
supply for the land to become inadequate or contaminated.
(4) The county board shall immediately approve  the petition if the county board deter-
mines that:
(a) The conditions described in subsection (2) of this section are met;
(b) The petition meets the requirements of subsection (3) of this section; and
(c) The district, or an independent water  supply source of the district, has a water supply
sufficient to provide water to the land.
(5) If the petition is approved  under subsection (4) of this section, the county board shall
enter an order describing the boundaries  of the land and declaring the land annexed to the
district.
(6) Subject to the provisions  of ORS 264.306 and 264.314, the district, or an independent
water supply source of the district, shall provide water to land annexed under this section.
SECTION 3.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3126 (HB 3126-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 10, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3126 (HB 3126-A) Page 2